North Dakota, session 69, HB1036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 34-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Division of apprenticeship - Duties .
1. There is created a division of apprenticeship within the department of labor and human
rights.
2. Employees of the division of apprenticeship shall report to the labor commissioner.
3. The labor commissioner may appoint a division director to oversee the division. If the
labor commissioner appoints a division director, all employees shall report to the
division director and the division director shall report to the labor commissioner.
4. The division of apprenticeship:
a. Shall assist, coordinate, and collaborate with the state director from the office of
apprenticeship of the United States department of labor to administer the federal
apprenticeship system within the state.
b. Shall develop and implement a statewide strategy to support the state director
from the office of apprenticeship of the United States department of labor to
maintain and manage existing apprenticeship programs and develop and expand
newly created apprenticeship programs in the state.
Page No. 1 25.0348.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
c. Shall develop a pilot program to support a business operating or seeking to
create an apprenticeship program under the federal apprenticeship system.
d. May contract with other state agencies to develop and administer programs to
assist the state director from the office of apprenticeship of the United States
department of labor in promoting entrance in the federal apprenticeship system.
5. This section does not apply to an apprenticeship program maintained, managed, or
overseen by any state board or commission in this state.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND HUMAN RIGHTS -
DIVISION OF APPRENTICESHIP - FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT POSITIONS - REPORT TO
THE SEVENTIETH LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the
general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $650,000, or so much
of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of labor and human rights for the purpose
of providing salaries and benefits for the division of apprenticeship staff, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The department of labor and human rights is
authorized three full-time equivalent positions to administer the division of apprenticeship. The
department of labor and human rights shall report to the seventieth legislative assembly
regarding the number of apprentices and employers assisted through the division of
apprenticeship and the number of new apprenticeship programs created during the 2025-27
biennium.
Page No. 2 25.0348.02000